Hawaii statutes.
§674-14 Annual report. The panel shall
prepare a report to be transmitted to the governor and to the legislature, at
least twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 1998, and a
final report to be transmitted to the governor and to the legislature, at least
twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 1999, which
summarizes its activities in furtherance of this chapter, and shall include a
summary of each claim brought before the panel, the panel's findings and
advisory opinion regarding the merits of each claim, and an estimate of the
probable compensation or recommended corrective action by the State, for action
by the legislature in regular session. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c
351, §9; am L 1997, c 382, §5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next